New York, session 2025-2026, S9379.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature finds that 2 limited English proficiency continues to impede equitable access to 3 public services. To ensure meaningful language access, agencies must 4 formally designate language-specific civil service titles for customer- 5 facing roles where high-need languages are prevalent. This act mandates 6 the creation, certification, and staffing of such titles based on county 7 and statewide language data. 8 § 2. The civil service law is amended by adding a new section 155 to 9 read as follows: 10 § 155. Language-specific titles for customer-facing roles. 1. As used 11 in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings: 12 (a) "Customer-facing title" shall mean any competitive or non-competi- 13 tive civil service title of the state or of any municipal corporation or 14 political subdivision of the state in which the primary duties involve 15 direct interaction with members of the public for intake, eligibility 16 determination, service provision, or complaint resolution. 17 (b) "High-need language" shall mean any language that: 18 (i) Ranks among the top three spoken languages (excluding English) in 19 the county served by the agency; or 20 (ii) Ranks among the top five spoken languages (excluding English) 21 statewide, as determined by the most recent U.S. Census or agency intake 22 data. 23 (c) "Language-specific title" shall mean a civil service title of the 24 state or of any municipal corporation or political subdivision of the 25 state formally designated to require proficiency in a specific high-need 26 language, reflected in the title name and examination criteria. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13792-01-5 S. 9379 2 1 2. The department shall establish language-specific variants of exist- 2 ing customer-facing titles where high-need language thresholds are met. 3 Such language-specific variants of existing customer-facing titles shall 4 include language proficiency testing as part of the examination process 5 and be listed separately on eligible lists. 6 3. (a) Every agency shall fill no fewer than twenty-five percent of 7 customer-facing positions in applicable titles using language-specific 8 designations aligned with their service area's high-need languages. An 9 agency may exceed this threshold based on demonstrated limited English 10 proficiency service demand. 11 (b) An agency may request a waiver for specific titles if customer 12 service metrics established by the department are being met. 13 (c) Interpretation services shall be used by an agency where the 14 applicable language-specific title list is empty. 15 4. (a) Every agency shall submit an annual report to the department 16 detailing: 17 (i) The number of language-specific positions filled and vacant; 18 (ii) The number of limited English proficiency clients served of each 19 language; and 20 (iii) The use of interpretation services and unmet language needs. 21 (b) The department shall publish on its website a statewide dashboard 22 tracking compliance with the provisions of this section, disaggregated 23 by agency, title, county, and language. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 25 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 26 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 27 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 28 completed on or before such effective date.